Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-721
Multicultural education; school districts and department; duties; loss of accreditation.

(1) Each school district shall present evidence annually, in a form prescribed by the State Department of Education, to the department that multicultural education is being taught to students pursuant to section 79-720. The department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the multicultural education program and establish reasonable timelines for the submission of such evidence.

(2) A school district which fails to provide or fails to provide evidence annually of multicultural education pursuant to such section shall lose its accreditation status.

Laws 1992, LB 922, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,231;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 395.